Washington statutes.
RCW 35.78.020

State design standards—Committee—Membership.

There is created a state design standards committee of seven members, six of whom shall be appointed by the executive committee of the Association of Washington Cities to hold office at its pleasure and the seventh to be the state aid engineer. The members to be appointed by the executive committee of the Association of Washington Cities shall be restricted to the membership of the association or to those holding office and/or performing the function of chief engineer in any of the several municipalities in the state.

[ 1984 c 7 s 24; 1965 c 7 s 35.78.020. Prior: 1949 c 164 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9300-2.]